Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB78.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 304.17A-660 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 304.17A-660 to 304.17A-669, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Classification of benefits" means the classification of benefits set forth in 45
C.F.R. sec. 146.136(c)(2)(ii)(A);
(2) "Mental health condition" means any condition or disorder that involves mental
illness or substance use disorder as defined in KRS 222.005 and that falls under any
of the diagnostic categories listed in the most recent version of the Diagnostic and
Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders or that is listed in the mental disorders
section of the most recent version of the International Classification of Disease;
(3) "Nonquantitative treatment limitation" means any limitation that is not expressed
numerically but otherwise limits the scope or duration of benefits for treatment;
(4) "Psychiatric collaborative care model" means the evidence-based, integrated
behavioral health service delivery method described in 81 Fed. Reg. 80230;
(5) "Terms or conditions" includes day or visit limits, episodes of care, any lifetime or
annual payment limits, deductibles, copayments, prescription coverage,
coinsurance, out-of-pocket limits, and any other cost-sharing requirements; and
(6)[(5)] "Treatment of a mental health condition" includes but is not limited to any
necessary outpatient, inpatient, residential, partial hospitalization, day treatment,
emergency detoxification, or crisis stabilization services.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 304.17A-660 TO
304.17A-669 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) All insurers that issue, deliver, or renew any health benefit plan that
provides coverage for treatment of a mental health condition shall provide
reimbursement for those benefits that are delivered through the psychiatric
collaborative care model, which shall include the following Current
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 12/30/2024 3:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 950
Procedural Terminology billing codes maintained by the American Medical
Association:
1. 99492;
2. 99493; and
3. 99494.
(b) The commissioner shall update the list of billing codes to be included under
this subsection if there are any alterations or additions to the billing codes
used for the psychiatric collaborative care model.
(2) All insurers that issue, deliver, or renew any health benefit plan that provides
coverage for treatment of a mental health condition may deny reimbursement of
any billing code referenced in this section on the grounds of medical necessity,
provided that the medical necessity determinations are in compliance with the
provisions of the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and
Addiction Equity Act of 2008, codified at 42 U.S.C. sec. 300gg-26, as amended,
and any related federal regulations, as amended, and that the determinations are
made in accordance with the utilization review requirements in KRS 304.17A-600
to 304.17A-633.
Section 3. Section 2 of this Act applies to health benefit plans issued, delivered,
or renewed on or after January 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 12/30/2024 3:15 PM Jacketed